fr: Type de fourrure: Fausse fourrure; Renard; Vison; Orylag; Lapin; Raton laveur; Peau lainée (agneau); Agneau du Tibet; Autre
sk-SK: Typ srsti: Umelá kožušina; Líška; Norok; Orylag (králik); Králik; Mýval; Strihaná ovčia koža (jahňa); Tibetská ovca; Iné
el: Τύπος γούνας: Συνθετική γούνα; Αλεπού; Μινκ; Orylag; Κουνέλι; Ρακούν; Προβατάκι (Shearling); Θιβετιανό πρόβατο; Άλλο
lt-LT: Kailio tipas: Dirbtinis kailis; Lapė; Audinė; Orilagas; Triušis; Meškėnas; Kirptas avikailis; Tibeto ėriukas; Kita
da: Type af pels: Imiteret pels; Ræv; Mink; Orylag; Kanin; Vaskebjørn; Shearling (lam); Tibetansk lam; Andet
hr-HR: Vrsta krzna: Umjetno krzno; Lisica; Nerac; Orylag; Zec; Rakun; Janjeća koža s krznom (shearling); Tibetansko janje; Ostalo
es: Tipo de piel: Piel sintética; Zorro; Visón; Orylag; Conejo; Mapache; Piel de oveja (cordero); Cordero tibetano; Otro
sv: Pälstyp: Fuskpäls; Räv; Mink; Orylag; Kanin; Tvättbjörn; Shearling (lamm); Tibetanskt lamm; Övrigt
ko: 모피 유형: 인조 모피; 여우; 밍크; 오릴라그; 토끼; 라쿤; 시어링(양); 티베트 양; 기타
bg-BG: Тип козина: Изкуствена козина; Лисица; Норка; Орилаг; Заек; Миеща мечка; Агнешка кожа; Тибетско агне; Друго
pl: Typ futra: Sztuczne futro; Lis; Norka; Królik orylag; Królik; Szop pracz; Kożuch (owca); Owca tybetańska; Inne
sl-SI: Vrsta dlake: Umetno krzno; Lisica; Norka; Orylag; Zajec; Rakun; Strižena ovca (jagnje); Tibetansko jagnje; Drugo
pt-PT: Tipo de pelo: Pelo sintético; Raposa; Vison; Orylag; Coelho; Guaxinim; Pele de ovelha (borrego); Borrego tibetano; Outro
zh-CN: 皮料类型: 人造毛皮; 狐狸毛; 貂皮; 奥力拉格兔毛; 兔毛; 浣熊毛; 剪绒羊毛（羔羊）; 藏羊毛; 其他
th: ประเภทขนสัตว์: ขนสัตว์เทียม; จิ้งจอก; มิงค์; โอรีแล็ก; กระต่าย; แรคคูน; ขนลูกแกะ; แกะทิเบต; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ srsti: Umělá kožešina; Liška; Norek; Orylag; Králík; Mýval; Ovčí rouno (jehněčí); Tibetské jehněčí; Ostatní
it: Tipo di pelliccia: Ecopelliccia; Volpe; Visone; Orylag; Coniglio; Procione; Shearling (agnello); Agnello del Tibet; Altro
zh-TW: 毛皮類型: 人造皮草; 狐狸毛; 貂皮; 奧利拉格兔毛; 兔毛; 浣熊毛; 剪羊毛 (羔羊); 西藏羊毛; 其他
tr: Kürk türü: Suni kürk; Tilki; Vizon; Orylag; Tavşan; Rakun; Kuzu postu; Tibet kuzusu; Diğer
pt-BR: Tipo de pelo: Pele sintética; Raposa; Vison; Orylag; Coelho; Guaxinim; Pele de ovelha (cordeiro); Cordeiro tibetano; Outro
ro-RO: Tipul de blană: Blană artificială; Vulpe; Nurcă; Orylag; Iepure; Raton; Blană de miel tunsă; Miel tibetan; Altele
en: Fur type: Faux fur; Fox; Mink; Orylag; Rabbit; Raccoon; Shearling (lamb); Tibetan lamb; Other
ru: Тип меха: Искусственный мех; Лиса; Норка; Орилаг; Кролик; Енот; Овчина (ягненок); Тибетский ягненок; Другое
de: Fellart: Kunstpelz; Fuchs; Nerz; Orylag; Kaninchen; Waschbär; Lammfell; Tibetlamm; Sonstige
ja: 毛皮タイプ: フェイクファー; フォックス; ミンク; オリラグ; ラビット; ラクーン; シアリング (ラム); チベタンラム; その他
vi: Loại lông thú: Lông thú giả; Cáo; Chồn; Thỏ Orylag; Thỏ; Gấu mèo; Lông cừu non (shearling); Lông cừu Tây Tạng; Khác
fi: Turkistyyppi: Tekoturkis; Kettu; Minkki; Orylag; Kani; Pesukarhu; Lampaantalja; Tiibetinlammas; Muu
nb: Pelstype: Fuskepels; Rev; Mink; Orylag; Kanin; Vaskebjørn; Sauskinn (lam); Tibetansk lam; Annet
hu: Szőrme típusa: Műszőrme; Róka; Nyérc; Orylag; Nyúl; Mosómedve; Irha (bárány); Tibeti bárány; Egyéb
nl: Bonttype: Nepbont; Vos; Nerts; Orylag; Konijn; Wasbeer; Lammy (lam); Tibetaans lam; Anders